California, session 20252026, SB1367.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65850.05 is added to the Government Code, to read:65850.05. (a) For purposes of this section, “detention facility” means any structure, whether temporary or permanent, operated by, or by a private entity on behalf of, of a governmental entity for the temporary holding of persons charged with a criminal offense. offense or detained for civil or administrative purposes.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a city or county shall not approve either of the following:(1) A new land use in a manner that authorizes construction of a detention facility.(2) A change of use that permits use of an existing building as a detention facility.SEC. 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that protecting California residents from the negative impacts of private detention centers is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 65850.05 to the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.